Louisiana, session 2026, HB533.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:255(AA) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§255. Witness fees to off-duty law enforcement officers
* * *
AA. In the Twenty-Second Judicial District, surplus monies in the special
fund in St. Tammany Parish at the end of each calendar year shall be transmitted by
the governing authority of St. Tammany Parish to the criminal court fund of the
Twenty-Second Judicial District Court. As used in this Subsection, "special fund"
means the special fund provided for in Subsection D of this Section, and "surplus
monies" means the amount of money which is in the special fund at the end of each
calendar year and which is in excess of the total amount paid from the special fund
as witness fees for off-duty law enforcement officers in that calendar year. The
surplus monies which are required to be transferred by this Subsection may be used
for any purpose the other monies in the criminal court fund of the Twenty-Second
Judicial District Court may be used. No money obligated to be paid to any officer
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 533 ENROLLED
or agency for an off-duty law enforcement court appearance shall be considered
surplus monies pursuant to this Subsection.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.